Washington statutes.
RCW 19.138.040

Written statement by seller of travel—Contents.

At or prior to the time of full or partial payment for any travel services, the seller of travel shall furnish to the person making the payment a written statement conspicuously setting forth the information contained in subsections (1) through (6) of this section. However, if payment is made other than in person, the seller of travel shall transmit to the person making the payment the written statement required by this section within three business days of receipt or processing of the payment. The written statement shall contain the following information:

(1) The name and business address and telephone number of the seller of travel.

(2) The amount paid, the date of such payment, the purpose of the payment made, and an itemized statement of the balance due, if any.

(3) The registration number of the seller of travel required by this chapter.

(4) The name of the vendor with whom the seller of travel has contracted to provide travel arrangements for a consumer and all pertinent information relating to the travel as known by the seller of travel at the time of booking. The seller of travel will make known further details as soon as received from the vendor. All information will be provided with final documentation.

(5) An advisory regarding the penalties that would be charged in the event of a cancellation or change by the customer. This may contain either: (a) The specific amount of cancellation and change penalties; or (b) the following statement: "Cancellation and change penalties apply to these arrangements. Details will be provided upon request."

(6) A statement in eight-point boldface type in substantially the following form:

"If transportation or other services are canceled by the seller of travel, all sums paid to the seller of travel for services not performed in accordance with the contract between the seller of travel and the purchaser will be refunded within thirty days of receiving the funds from the vendor with whom the services were arranged, or if the funds were not sent to the vendor, the funds shall be returned within fourteen days after cancellation by the seller of travel to the purchaser unless the purchaser requests the seller of travel to apply the money to another travel product and/or date."

[ 1999 c 238 s 2; 1996 c 180 s 3; 1994 c 237 s 11; 1986 c 283 s 4.]

NOTES:

Severability—1999 c 238: See note following RCW 19.138.030.

Effective date—1996 c 180: See note following RCW 19.138.021.